District of Columbia statutes.
34-204

“Corporation” defined.

The term “corporation” when used in this subtitle includes a corporation, company, association, and joint-stock company or association.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 974, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
1981 Ed., § 43-205.
1973 Ed., § 43-105.